Florida, session 2026, HB887.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (f) is added to subsection (7) of
section 381.986, Florida Statutes, to read:
381.986 Medical use of marijuana.—
(7) IDENTIFICATION CARDS.—
(f) The department shall charge a reduced fee of $15 for
the issuance, replacement, or renewal of an identification card
for a qualified patient who is a veteran, as defined in s.
1.01(14), if the application includes a copy of any of the
following as proof of veteran status:
1. A DD-214 form;
2. A Department of Veterans Affairs identification card or
a Uniformed Services identification card indicating retired
status; or
3. A Florida driver license bearing the veteran
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb887-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 887 2026
designation.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb887-00